Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Alaska Health Care Commission.

Sec. 18.09.010.
Alaska Health Care Commission.

The Alaska Health Care Commission is established in the Department of Health and Social Services. The purpose of the commission is to provide recommendations for and foster the development of a statewide plan to address the quality, accessibility, and availability of health care for all citizens of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For transitional provision specifying the continued service of members of the former Alaska Health Care Commission established by Administrative Order No. 246 as the initial voting members of the commission established by this section and specifying the duration of their terms of service, see § 6, ch. 96, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.09.020.
Composition; chair.

The commission consists of 14 members as follows:

11 voting members appointed by the governor as follows:

the state officer assigned the duties of medical director for the department, who shall serve as chair;

one member who represents the tribal health community in the state;

one member who represents a statewide chamber of commerce who is not financially associated with the health care industry;

one member who represents the Alaska State Hospital and Nursing Home Association;

one member who is a health care provider and

engaged in the active practice of the health care provider’s profession in the state;

licensed to practice in the state;

not affiliated with the Alaska State Hospital and Nursing Home Association;

one member who represents the health insurance industry in the state;

one member who is

a health care consumer;

a resident of the state; and

not employed by and does not have a business interest in the health care industry;

one member who is a licensed primary care physician in the state and who is in the active practice of family medicine, primary care internal medicine, or pediatric medicine;

one member who represents the Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority;

one member who represents community health centers in the state;

one member who is involved in the United States Department of Veterans Affairs health care industry;

three nonvoting members appointed as follows:

one ex officio member from the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

one ex officio member from the senate, appointed by the president of the senate;

an ex officio member representing the Office of the Governor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2010)

Sec. 18.09.030.
Public members’ terms of office.

Public members of the commission serve for staggered terms of three years or until a successor is appointed.

If a vacancy occurs in a public member’s seat on the commission, the governor shall make an appointment for the unexpired portion of that member’s term.

A public member may serve not more than two consecutive terms.

In this section, “public member” means those members appointed under AS

18.09.020

(1)(B) — (K).

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2010)

Sec. 18.09.040.
Executive director.

The commission may employ an executive director, who may not be a member of the commission and who may be current staff of the department. The executive director serves at the pleasure of the commission. The commission shall establish the duties of the executive director. The executive director is in the partially exempt service under AS 39.25 (State Personnel Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2010)

Sec. 18.09.050.
Staff.

The department may assign employees of the department to serve as staff to the commission. The commission shall prescribe the duties of the commission staff.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2010)

Sec. 18.09.060.
Bylaws.

The commission, on approval of a majority of its membership and consistent with state law, shall adopt and amend bylaws governing proceedings and other activities, including provisions concerning

a quorum to transact commission business and other aspects of procedure;

frequency and location of meetings;

establishment, functions, and membership of committees; and

conflicts of interest that require

a member to declare a substantial financial interest in an official action and to request to be excused from voting in that instance;

a ruling by the chair on a request by a member to be excused from voting;

an opportunity to override a ruling by the chair on a majority vote;

filing of a written disclosure form with the department that lists all potential conflicts of interest of a member valued at more than $5,000 annually if the interest is related to health care system income affecting the member or a member of the member’s immediate family.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2010)

Sec. 18.09.070.
Duties of the commission.

The commission shall serve as the state health planning and coordinating body. Consistent with state and federal law, the commission shall provide recommendations for and foster the development of a statewide health plan containing the following:

a comprehensive statewide health care policy;

a strategy for improving the health of all residents of the state that

encourages personal responsibility for disease prevention, healthy living, and acquisition of health insurance;

reduces health care costs by using savings from

enhanced market forces;

fraud reduction;

health information technology;

management efficiency;

preventative medicine;

successful innovations identified by other states; and

other cost-saving measures;

eliminates known health risks, including unsafe water and wastewater systems;

develops a sustainable health care workforce;

improves access to quality health care; and

increases the number of insurance options for health care services.

The commission may hold public hearings to gather information and opinions from health care consumers on matters before the commission. Hearings shall be conducted under AS

44.62.210

, except that the commission shall provide public notice of hearings not less than 15 days before the conduct of the hearing and include not fewer than three notices published in the statewide news media.

The commission shall submit to the governor and the legislature by January 15 of each year an annual report regarding the commission’s recommendations and activities. The report shall include voting records, copies of financial disclosures, and conflicts of interest statements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2010)

Sec. 18.09.080.
Compensation, per diem, and expenses.

A member appointed to the commission under AS

18.09.020

(1) is entitled to per diem, reimbursement for travel, and other expenses authorized by law for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 2010)